Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.220 and 2022 c 239 s 1 and 2022 c 117 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special license plate fee as listed in this section.PLATE TYPEINITIAL FEERENEWAL FEEDISTRIBUTED UNDER(1) 4-H$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(2) Amateur radio license$ 5.00N/ARCW 46.68.070(3) Armed forces$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(4) Breast cancer awareness$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(5) Collector vehicle$ 35.00N/ARCW 46.68.030(6) Collegiate$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.430(7) Endangered wildlife$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(8) Fred Hutch$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(9) Gonzaga University alumni association$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(10) Helping kids speak$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(11) Horseless carriage$ 35.00N/ARCW 46.68.030(12) Keep kids safe$ 45.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(13) Law enforcement memorial$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(14) Military affiliate radio system$ 5.00N/ARCW 46.68.070(15) Music matters$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(16) Patches pal, or alternative name as designated by the department under RCW 46.04.383$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(17) Professional firefighters and paramedics$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(18) Purple Heart$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(19) Ride share$ 25.00N/ARCW 46.68.030(20) San Juan Islands$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(21) Seattle Mariners$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(22) Seattle NHL hockey$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(23) Seattle Seahawks$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(24) Seattle Sounders FC$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(25) Seattle Storm$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(26) Seattle University$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(27) Share the road$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(28) Ski & ride Washington$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(29) Square dancer$ 40.00N/ARCW 46.68.070(30) State flower$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(31) United States Naval Academy$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(32) Volunteer firefighters$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((32)))(33) Washington apples$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((33)))(34) Washington farmers and ranchers$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((34)))(35) Washington lighthouses$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((35)))(36) Washington state aviation$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((36)))(37) Washington state parks$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(((37)))(38) Washington state wrestling$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((38)))(39) Washington tennis$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((39)))(40) Washington wine$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((40)))(41) Washington's fish collection$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(((41)))(42) Washington's national parks$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((42)))(43) Washington's wildlife collection$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425(((43)))(44) We love our pets$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.420(((44)))(45) Wild on Washington$ 40.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.425Sec. 2. RCW 46.18.200 and 2022 c 239 s 2 and 2022 c 117 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the department:(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates unless otherwise specified;(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the department;(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW; and(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the department.(2) The department approves and shall issue the following special license plates, subject to subsection (5) of this section:LICENSE PLATEDESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK4-HDisplays the "4-H" logo.Armed forces collectionRecognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty military personnel, reservists, and members of the national guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and national guard.Breast cancer awarenessDisplays a pink ribbon symbolizing breast cancer awareness.Endangered wildlifeDisplays a symbol or artwork symbolizing endangered wildlife in Washington state.Fred HutchDisplays the Fred Hutch logo.Gonzaga University alumni associationRecognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.Helping kids speakRecognizes an organization that supports programs that provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.Keep kids safeRecognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.Law enforcement memorialHonors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty.Music mattersDisplays the "Music Matters" logo.Patches pal, or alternative name as designated by the department under RCW 46.04.383Displays the likenesses of the J.P. Patches and Gertrude characters from the J.P. Patches show, or characters otherwise identified in accordance with RCW 46.04.383.Professional firefighters and paramedicsRecognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who are members of the Washington state council of firefighters.San Juan IslandsDisplays a symbol or artwork recognizing the San Juan Islands.Seattle MarinersDisplays the "Seattle Mariners" logo.Seattle NHL hockeyDisplays the logo of the Seattle NHL hockey team.Seattle SeahawksDisplays the "Seattle Seahawks" logo.Seattle Sounders FCDisplays the "Seattle Sounders FC" logo.Seattle StormDisplays the "Seattle Storm" logo.Seattle UniversityRecognizes Seattle University.Share the roadRecognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety and awareness education.Ski & ride WashingtonRecognizes the Washington snowsports industry.State flowerRecognizes the Washington state flower.United States Naval AcademyDisplays a design related to the United States Naval Academy.Volunteer firefightersRecognizes volunteer firefighters.Washington applesDisplays the Washington apple logo that recognizes the state's apple industry, the growers and shippers who produce and pack the world famous apples, and the tree fruit community.Washington farmers and ranchersRecognizes farmers and ranchers in Washington state.Washington lighthousesRecognizes an organization that supports selected Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental education programs.Washington state aviationDisplays a Stearman biplane in the foreground with an image of Mount Rainier in the background.Washington state parksRecognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural, cultural, historical, and recreational resources.Washington state wrestlingPromotes and supports college wrestling in the state of Washington.Washington tennisBuilds awareness and year-round opportunities for tennis in Washington state. Displays a symbol or artwork recognizing tennis in Washington state.Washington wineDisplays a landscape of Washington's wine regions.Washington's fish collectionRecognizes Washington's fish.Washington's national park fundBuilds awareness of Washington's national parks and supports priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parks.Washington's wildlife collectionRecognizes Washington's wildlife.We love our petsRecognizes an organization that assists local member agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.Wild on WashingtonSymbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.(3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters and paramedics special license plates must show proof of eligibility by providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state council of firefighters.(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighters special license plates must (a) have been a volunteer firefighter for at least ((ten))10 years or be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and (b) have documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service before ((ten))10 years of service have been completed, the volunteer firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the department on the registration renewal date. If the volunteer firefighter stays in service for at least ((ten))10 years and then leaves, the license plate may be retained by the former volunteer firefighter and as long as the license plate is retained for use the person will continue to pay the future registration renewals. A qualifying volunteer firefighter may have no more than one set of license plates per vehicle, and a maximum of two sets per applicant, for their personal vehicles. If the volunteer firefighter is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or a felony, the license plates must be surrendered upon conviction.(5) The department shall not issue the Seattle NHL hockey special license plate until the department receives signature sheets satisfying the requirements identified in RCW 46.18.110(2)(f).Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.425 and 2016 c 31 s 3 and 2016 c 30 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall:(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate type:SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPEACCOUNTCONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDSArmed forcesRCW 43.60A.140As specified in RCW 43.60A.140(4)Breast cancer awarenessRCW 43.70.327Must be used only by the department of health for efforts consistent with the breast, cervical, and colon health programEndangered wildlifeRCW 77.12.170Must be used only for the department of fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife program activitiesKeep kids safeRCW 43.121.100As specified in RCW 43.121.100Purple HeartRCW 43.60A.140As specified in RCW 43.60A.140(4)United States Naval AcademyRCW 43.60A.140As specified in RCW 43.60A.140(4)Washington state parksRCW 79A.05.059Provide public educational opportunities and enhancement of Washington state parksWashington's fish collectionRCW 77.12.170Only for the department of fish and wildlife's use to support steelhead species management activities including, but not limited to, activities supporting conservation, recovery, and research to promote healthy, fishable steelheadWashington's wildlife collectionRCW 77.12.170Only for the department of fish and wildlife's game species management activitiesWild on WashingtonRCW 77.12.170Dedicated to the department of fish and wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as defined in RCW 77.32.560Sec. 4. RCW 43.60A.140 and 2023 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The veterans stewardship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Disbursements of funds must be on the authorization of the director or the director's designee, and only for the purposes stated in subsection (4) of this section. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, funds are subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of the funds.(2) The department may request and accept nondedicated contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds generated by the issuance of the armed forces license plate collection and the United States Naval Academy license plate under chapter 46.18 RCW.(3) All receipts from the sale of armed forces license plates, United States Naval Academy license plates, and Purple Heart license plates as required under RCW 46.68.425(2) must be deposited into the veterans stewardship account.(4) All moneys deposited into the veterans stewardship account must be used by the department for activities that benefit veterans or their families, including but not limited to, providing programs and services for homeless veterans; establishing memorials honoring veterans; and maintaining state veterans' cemeteries. Funds from the account may not be used to supplant existing funds received by the department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"United States Naval Academy license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a design related to the United States Naval Academy.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act takes effect November 1, 2025.--- END ---